bg-BG: Размер на резбовата връзка: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 мм; 7 мм; M7; Друго
sv: Gängkopplingens storlek: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Annat
da: Gevindtilslutningsstørrelse: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Andet
pl: Rozmiar połączenia gwintowanego: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Inne
ru: Размер резьбового соединения: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 мм; 7 мм; M7; Другое
vi: Kích thước ren kết nối: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Khác
es: Tamaño de la conexión de hilo: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Otro
hu: szál kapcsolat méretet: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Egyéb
sl-SI: Velikost navojnega priključka: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Drugo
ja: ねじ接続サイズ: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; その他
zh-TW: 線材連接尺寸: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; 其他
tr: Diş ölçüsü: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Diğer
sk-SK: Veľkosť závitového pripojenia: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Iné
fr: Taille du filetage de raccordement: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Autre
pt-PT: Tamanho da rosca de ligação: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Outro
cs: Velikost závitu: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Ostatní
lt-LT: Sriegio jungties dydis: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Kitas
en: Thread connection size: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Other
fi: Siiman liitoksen koko: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Muu
it: Misura del filetto di collegamento: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Altro
nb: Størrelse på gjengeforbindelse: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Annet
th: จะต้องคำนึงถึงขนาด: 11/32 นิ้ว; 5/16"-24; 6 มม.; 7 มม.; M7; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Rosca de conexão tamanho: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Outros
de: Gewindeanschlussgröße: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Sonstige
el: νήμα μέγεθος σύνδεσης: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Άλλο
ko: 나사산 연결 사이즈: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; 기타
zh-CN: 螺纹连接尺寸: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; 其他
nl: Draad verbindingsmaat: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Overige
ro-RO: Dimensiunea racordului filetat: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Altele
hr-HR: Veličina navojnog spoja: 11/32"; 5/16"-24; 6 mm; 7 mm; M7; Ostalo